Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1820.11, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1820.11. A. Any person applying for a license to
engage in a fire extinguisher industry business pursuant to the Fire
Extinguisher Licensing Act shall provide evidence to the Fire
Extinguisher Industry Committee that the individual within this
state having direct supervision over the function and local
operations of the fire extinguisher industry business or a branch
thereof has the following qualifications:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3081 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. The individual is at least twenty-one (21) eighteen (18)
years of age;
2. The individual has not been declared by any court of
competent jurisdiction incompetent by reason of mental defect or
disease;
3. The individual is not a habitual user of intoxicating
liquors or habit-forming drugs;
4. The individual has not been discharged from the Armed
Services of the United States under other than honorable conditions;
and
5. The individual meets such other standards as may be
established by the State Fire Marshal Commission relating to
experience or knowledge of the fire extinguisher industry.
B. The applicant shall advise the Committee and furnish full
information on each individual described in subsection A of this
section of any conviction of a felony crime which substantially
relates to the occupation of an individual in a fire extinguisher
industry business and poses a reasonable threat to public safety for
which a full pardon has not been granted. The applicant shall
furnish a recent photograph of a type prescribed by the Committee
and two classifiable sets of fingerprints of such individual.
C. As used in this section:
1. "Substantially relates" means the nature of criminal conduct
for which the person was convicted has a direct bearing on the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3081 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

fitn ess or ability to perform one or more of the duties or
responsibilities necessarily related to the occupation; and
2. "Poses a reasonable threat" means the nature of criminal
conduct for which the person was convicted involved an act or threat
of harm against another and has a bearing on the fitness or ability
to serve the public or work with others in the occupation.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1820.12, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1820.12. A. An application for a license shall
include:
1. The address of the principal office of the applicant and the
address of each branch office located within this state;
2. The name of each business location under which the applicant
intends to do business as a licensee; and
3. A statement as to the extent and scope of the fire
extinguisher industry business of the applicant and all other
businesses in which the applicant is engaged in this state;
4. A recent photograph of the applicant of a type prescribed by
the State Fire Marshal Commission if the applicant is a sole
proprietor, or a photograph of each officer and of each partner or
shareholder who owns a twenty-five percent (25%) or greater interest
in the applicant, if the applicant is an entity; and
5. Such other information, statements, or documents as may be
required by the State Fire Marshal Commission.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3081 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. An applicant for an individual license shall provide such
documents, statements or other information as may be required by the
State Fire Marshal Commission, including two classifiable sets of
fingerprints of the applicant. The fingerprints may be used for a
national criminal history record check as defined by Section 150.9
of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. Fees for license and license renewal issued pursuant to the
Fire Extinguisher Licensing Act shall be adopted by the State Fire
Marshal Commission pursuant to Section 1820.19 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title. An applicant shall pay the license
fee at the time the applicant makes application.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1820.13, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1820.13. A. 1. Upon making a proper initial fire
extinguisher business application, payment of the proper license fee
and certification of approval by the Fire Extinguisher Industry
Committee, the State Fire Marshal shall issue a an initial fire
extinguisher business license to the applicant. The fire
extinguisher business license shall be valid for a one-year term.
2. Upon making a proper initial individual application,
individual renewal application, or fire extinguisher business
renewal application, and payment of the proper license fee, the
State Fire Marshal shall issue all initial individual licenses,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3081 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

indi vidual renewal licenses, and fire extinguisher business renewal
licenses. These licenses shall be valid for a one-year term.
B. Renewal of a license shall not prohibit disciplinary
proceedings for an act committed prior to the renewal.
C. The State Fire Marshal Commission may adopt a system under
which licenses expire on various dates throughout the year. For any
change in such expiration dates, license fees shall be prorated on
an appropriate periodic basis.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
April 16, 2026 - DO PASS














SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3081 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)